Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Phenylketonuria (PKU) and Other Heritable Diseases.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, § 71 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 7 — 15.

Sec. 18.15.200.
Screening for phenylketonuria.

A physician who attends a newborn child shall cause this child to be tested for phenylketonuria (PKU). If the mother is delivered in the absence of a physician, the nurse who first visits the child shall cause this test to be performed.

The department shall adopt regulations regarding the method used and the time or times of testing as accepted medical practice indicates.

The necessary laboratory tests and the test materials, reporting forms, and mailing cartons shall be provided by the department.

All tests considered positive by the screening method shall be reported by the screening laboratory to the physician and to the department. The department shall provide services for the performance of a quantitative blood phenylalanine test or its equivalent for diagnostic purposes. A confirmed diagnosis of phenylketonuria shall be reported to the physician and to the department. The department shall provide services for treatment and clinical follow-up of any diagnosed case.

When presumptive positive screening tests have been reported to the department, it shall provide, on request, either the true blood phenylalanine test or subsidize the performance of this test at an approved laboratory.

A licensed physician or licensed nurse attending a newborn or infant who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $500. However, a person attending a newborn or infant whose request for appropriate specimens from the newborn or infant is denied by the parent or guardian is not guilty of a misdemeanor. The fact that a child has not been subjected to the test because a request for appropriate specimens has been denied by the parents or guardian shall be reported to the department.

In this section, “physician” means a doctor of medicine licensed to practice medicine in this state, or an officer in the regular medical service of the armed forces of the United States or the United States Public Health Service assigned to duty in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1967; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, what was formerly the last sentence of subsection (f) was renumbered as AS

18.15.210

.

Cross references. —

For duty of certified midwife to comply with this section, see
AS

08.65.140

.

Administrative Code. —

For screening of newborn children for metabolic disorders, see 7 AAC 27, art. 10.

Sec. 18.15.205.
Screening for congenital heart disease.

A provider of birthing services who attends a birth in the state shall ensure that, as close to 24 hours after the birth as feasible, screening for congenital heart defects through pulse oximetry equipment and methods appropriate for use on a newborn is performed on the newborn, unless screening is refused under (d) of this section.

A provider of birthing services who attends a birth in the state shall, as soon as possible after screening conducted under (a) of this section, make a referral for confirmatory testing on a newborn whose pulse oximetry results are abnormal and provide advice to the parent or legal guardian regarding the need for appropriate interventions.

The provider who performs pulse oximetry screening under (a) of this section shall report to the parents and attending physicians of the newborn and to the department the results of screening.

Before performing screening for congenital heart disease under (a) of this section, a provider of birthing services shall provide to a parent or legal guardian of a newborn information on the screening and the option to refuse the screening.

The department shall establish procedures for submitting reports of newborn screening results to the department and for summarizing reported data.

In this section, “provider of birthing services” means a physician, midwife, nurse, or other qualified professional who attends the delivery of a newborn in the course of the provider’s practice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 2013)

Sec. 18.15.210.
Testing for certain other heritable diseases.

The department shall administer and provide services for testing for other heritable diseases that lead to intellectual disabilities, developmental disabilities, or both, and physical disabilities as screening programs accepted by current medical practice and as developed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was formerly the last sentence of AS

18.15.200(f)

. Renumbered in 2002.